Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 10. Patient Rights.

Sec. 47.30.817.
Advance health care directives.

A health care provider or a health care institution may not require or prohibit the execution or revocation of an advance health care directive as a condition for admission, discharge, or providing health care. In this section, “advance health care directive,” “health care institution,” and “health care provider” have the meanings given in AS

13.52.390

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 83 SLA 2004)

Sec. 47.30.825.
Patient medical rights.

A patient who is receiving services under AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

has the rights described in this section.

The patient and the following persons, at the request of the patient, are entitled to participate in formulating the patient’s individualized treatment plan and to participate in the evaluation process as much as possible, at minimum to the extent of requesting specific forms of therapy, inquiring why specific therapies are or are not included in the treatment program, and being informed as to the patient’s present medical and psychological condition and prognosis: (1) the patient’s counsel, (2) the patient’s guardian, (3) a mental health professional previously engaged in the patient’s care outside of the evaluation facility or designated treatment facility, (4) a representative of the patient’s choice, (5) a person designated as the patient’s agent or surrogate with regard to mental health treatment decisions under AS 13.52, and (6) the adult designated under AS

47.30.725

. The mental health care professionals may not withhold any of the information described in this subsection from the patient or from others if the patient has signed a waiver of confidentiality or has designated the person who would receive the information as an agent or surrogate under AS 13.52 with regard to mental health treatment.

A patient who is capable of giving informed consent has the right to give and withhold consent to medication and treatment in all situations that do not involve a crisis or impending crisis as described in AS

47.30.838(a)(1)

. A facility shall follow the procedures required under AS

47.30.836

—

47.30.839

before administering psychotropic medication.

A locked quiet room, or other form of physical restraint, may not be used, except as provided in this subsection, unless a patient is likely to physically harm self or others unless restrained. The form of restraint used shall be that which is in the patient’s best interest and which constitutes the least restrictive alternative available. When practicable, the patient shall be consulted as to the patient’s preference among forms of adequate, medically advisable restraints including medication, and that preference shall be honored. Nothing in this section is intended to limit the right of staff to use a quiet room at the patient’s request or with the patient’s knowing concurrence when considered in the best interests of the patient. Patients placed in a quiet room or other physical restraint shall be checked at least every 15 minutes or more often if good medical practice so indicates. Patients in a quiet room must be visited by a staff member at least once every hour and must be given adequate food and drink and access to bathroom facilities. At no time may a patient be kept in a quiet room or other form of physical restraint against the patient’s will longer than necessary to accomplish the purposes set out in this subsection. All uses of a quiet room or other restraint shall be recorded in the patient’s medical record, the information including but not limited to the reasons for its use, the duration of use, and the name of the authorizing staff member.

[Repealed, § 12 ch 109 SLA 1992.]

A patient capable of giving informed consent has the absolute right to accept or refuse electroconvulsive therapy or aversive conditioning. A patient who lacks substantial capacity to make this decision may not be given this therapy or conditioning without a court order unless the patient expressly authorized that particular form of treatment in an advance health care directive properly executed under AS 13.52 or has authorized an agent or surrogate under AS 13.52 to make this decision and the agent or surrogate consents to the treatment on behalf of the patient.

In no event may treatment include psychosurgery, lobotomy, or other comparable form of treatment without specific informed consent of the patient, including a minor unless the minor is clearly too young or disabled to give an informed consent in which case the consent of the minor’s legal guardian is required. In addition, this treatment may not be given without a court order after hearing compatible with full due process.

When, in the written opinion of a patient’s attending physician, a true medical emergency exists and a surgical operation is necessary to save the life, physical health, eyesight, hearing, or member of the patient, the professional person in charge, or that person’s professional designee, may give consent to the surgical operation if time will not permit obtaining the consent of the proper relatives or guardian or appropriate judicial authority. However, an operation may not be authorized if the patient is not a minor and knowingly withholds consent on religious grounds.

A patient upon discharge shall be given a discharge plan specifying the kinds and amount of care and treatment the patient should have after discharge and such other steps as the patient might take to benefit the patient’s mental health after leaving the facility. The patient shall have the right to participate, as far as practicable, in formulating the patient’s discharge plan. A copy of the plan shall be given to the patient, the patient’s guardian, an adult designated in accordance with AS

47.30.725

, the court if appropriate, and any follow-up agencies.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 21 ch 142 SLA 1984; am §§ 5 — 7, 12 ch 109 SLA 1992; am §§ 4, 5 ch 63 SLA 1996; am §§ 9, 10 ch 83 SLA 2004)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective January 1, 2005, substituted references for agent or surrogate under AS 13.52 for references to attorney-in-fact in subsections (b) and (f), and substituted “an advance health care directive” for “a declaration” in subsection (f).

Sec. 47.30.830.
Prohibition of experimental treatments.

Experimental treatments involving any significant risk of physical or psychological harm may not be administered to a patient.

If the personnel of an evaluation or treatment facility are uncertain as to whether a proposed treatment is experimental or is experimental as applied to a particular patient or would involve a significant risk of mental or physical harm to the patient, the matter may be referred to the commissioner for a determination. The patient, the patient’s attorney and guardian, if any, and an adult designated by the patient, shall, simultaneously with the referral to the commissioner, be provided with copies of all the documents by which the referral is made and shall have the opportunity to provide evidence to the commissioner on the question.

A determination by the commissioner that a treatment is experimental and entails significant risks of mental or physical harm is binding upon all persons involved in the administration of treatment to a patient.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981)

Sec. 47.30.833.
Nutritional evaluation; right to proper diet.

A treatment facility shall conduct a nutritional evaluation of a person admitted or committed to a treatment facility for evaluation or treatment, whether the person is a voluntary or involuntary patient. The evaluation shall be conducted within the first week after the patient is admitted or committed.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a treatment facility is not required to conduct a nutritional evaluation of a patient who is released within 72 hours of arrival.

A patient has the right to a nutritionally sound and medically appropriate diet. After conducting the nutritional evaluation required under (a) of this section, the treatment facility shall take appropriate steps to correct the patient’s nutritional deficiencies.

History.

(§ 22 ch 142 SLA 1984)

Sec. 47.30.835.
Civil rights not impaired.

A person may not deny to a person who is undergoing evaluation or treatment under AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

a civil right, including but not limited to, the right to free exercise of religion and the right to dispose of property, sue and be sued, enter into contractual relationships, and vote. A person who violates this subsection commits the crime of interference with constitutional rights under AS

11.76.110

.

Court-ordered evaluation or treatment under AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

is not a determination of legal incapacity under AS

13.26.005

—

13.26.580

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 77 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2016, “AS

13.26.005

—

13.26.580

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.005

—

13.26.320

” to reflect the renumbering of that section.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (b), substituted “AS

13.26.005

—

13.26.320

” for “AS

13.26.005

— 13.26.330”.

Sec. 47.30.836.
Psychotropic medication in non-crisis situation.

An evaluation facility or designated treatment facility may not administer psychotropic medication to a patient in a situation that does not involve a crisis under AS

47.30.838(a)(1)

unless the patient

has the capacity to give informed consent to the medication, as described in AS

47.30.837

, and gives that consent; the facility shall document the consent in the patient’s medical chart;

authorized the use of psychotropic medication in an advance health care directive properly executed under AS 13.52 or authorized an agent or surrogate under AS 13.52 to consent to the use of psychotropic medication for the patient and the agent or surrogate does consent; or

is determined by a court to lack the capacity to give informed consent to the medication and the court approves use of the medication under AS

47.30.839

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 109 SLA 1992; am § 6 ch 63 SLA 1996; am § 11 ch 83 SLA 2004)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective January 1, 2005, substituted “an advance healthcare directive” for “a declaration” and references for agent or surrogate under AS 13.52 for references to attorney-in-fact in paragraph (2).

Sec. 47.30.837.
Informed consent.

A patient has the capacity to give informed consent for purposes of AS

47.30.836

if the patient is competent to make mental health or medical treatment decisions and the consent is voluntary and informed.

When seeking a patient’s informed consent under this section, the evaluation facility or designated treatment facility shall give the patient information that is necessary for informed consent in a manner that ensures maximum possible comprehension by the patient.

If an evaluation facility or designated treatment facility has provided to the patient the information necessary for the patient’s consent to be informed and the patient voluntarily consents, the facility may administer psychotropic medication to the patient unless the facility has reason to believe that the patient is not competent to make medical or mental health treatment decisions. If the facility has reason to believe that the patient is not competent to make medical or mental health treatment decisions and the facility wishes to administer psychotropic medication to the patient, the facility shall follow the procedures of AS

47.30.839

.

In this section,

“competent” means that the patient

has the capacity to assimilate relevant facts and to appreciate and understand the patient’s situation with regard to those facts, including the information described in (2) of this subsection;

appreciates that the patient has a mental disorder or impairment, if the evidence so indicates; denial of a significantly disabling disorder or impairment, when faced with substantial evidence of its existence, constitutes evidence that the patient lacks the capability to make mental health treatment decisions;

has the capacity to participate in treatment decisions by means of a rational thought process; and

is able to articulate reasonable objections to using the offered medication;

“informed” means that the evaluation facility or designated treatment facility has given the patient all information that is material to the patient’s decision to give or withhold consent, including

an explanation of the patient’s diagnosis and prognosis, or their predominant symptoms, with and without the medication;

information about the proposed medication, its purpose, the method of its administration, the recommended ranges of dosages, possible side effects and benefits, ways to treat side effects, and risks of other conditions, such as tardive dyskinesia;

a review of the patient’s history, including medication history and previous side effects from medication;

an explanation of interactions with other drugs, including over-the-counter drugs, street drugs, and alcohol;

information about alternative treatments and their risks, side effects, and benefits, including the risks of nontreatment; and

a statement describing the patient’s right to give or withhold consent to the administration of psychotropic medications in nonemergency situations, the procedure for withdrawing consent, and notification that a court may override the patient’s refusal;

“voluntary” means having genuine freedom of choice; a choice may be encouraged and remain voluntary, but consent obtained by using force, threats, or direct or indirect coercion is not voluntary.

History.

(§ 8 ch 109 SLA 1992)

Sec. 47.30.838.
Psychotropic medication in crisis situations.

Except as provided in (c) and (d) of this section, an evaluation facility or designated treatment facility may administer psychotropic medication to a patient without the patient’s informed consent, regardless of whether the patient is capable of giving informed consent, only if

there is a crisis situation, or an impending crisis situation, that requires immediate use of the medication to preserve the life of, or prevent significant physical harm to, the patient or another person, as determined by a physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse; the behavior or condition of the patient giving rise to a crisis under this paragraph and the staff’s response to the behavior or condition must be documented in the patient’s medical record; the documentation must include an explanation of alternative responses to the crisis that were considered or attempted by the staff and why those responses were not sufficient; and

the medication is ordered by a physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse; the order

may be written or oral and may be received by telephone, facsimile machine, or in person;

may include an initial dosage and may authorize additional, as needed, doses; if additional, as needed, doses are authorized, the order must specify the medication, the quantity of each authorized dose, the method of administering the medication, the maximum frequency of administration, the specific conditions under which the medication may be given, and the maximum amount of medication that may be administered to the patient in a 24-hour period;

is valid for only 24 hours and may be renewed by a physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse for a total of 72 hours, including the initial 24 hours, only after a personal assessment of the patient’s status and a determination that there is still a crisis situation as described in (1) of this subsection; upon renewal of an order under this subparagraph, the facts supporting the renewal shall be written into the patient’s medical record.

When a patient is no longer in the crisis situation that led to the use of psychotropic medication without consent under (a) of this section, an appropriate health care professional shall discuss the crisis with the patient, including precursors to the crisis, in order to increase the patient’s and the professional’s understanding of the episode and to discuss prevention of future crises. The professional shall seek and consider the patient’s recommendations for managing potential future crises.

If crisis situations as described in (a)(1) of this section occur repeatedly, or if it appears that they may occur repeatedly, the evaluation facility or designated treatment facility may administer psychotropic medication during no more than three crisis periods without the patient’s informed consent only with court approval under AS

47.30.839

.

An evaluation facility or designated treatment facility may administer psychotropic medication to a patient without the patient’s informed consent if the patient is unable to give informed consent but has authorized the use of psychotropic medication in an advance health care directive properly executed under AS 13.52 or has authorized an agent or surrogate under AS 13.52 to consent to this form of treatment for the patient and the agent or surrogate does consent.

History.

(§ 8 ch 109 SLA 1992; am §§ 7, 8 ch 63 SLA 1996; am § 12 ch 83 SLA 2004; am § 78 ch 41 SLA 2009; am § 52 ch 33 SLA 2016; am § 6 ch 28 SLA 2020)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective January 1, 2005, substituted “an advance healthcare directive” for “a declaration” and references for agent or surrogate under AS 13.52 for references to attorney-in-fact in subsection (d).

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (b), substituted “led” for “lead” following “the crisis situation that”.

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (a)(1), inserted “or advanced practice registered” preceding “nurse”.

The 2020 amendment, effective July 28, 2020, in (a)(1), substituted “as determined by a physician, physician assistant,” for “as determined by a licensed physician or a registered”, in (a)(2), substituted “by a physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse” for “by a licensed physician”, and in (a)(2)(C), inserted “, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse” following “physician”.

Notes to Decisons

Cited

in

In re Necessity for the Hospitalization of Lucy G., 448 P.3d 868 (Alaska 2019).

Sec. 47.30.839.
Court-ordered administration of medication.

An evaluation facility or designated treatment facility may use the procedures described in this section to obtain court approval of administration of psychotropic medication if

there have been, or it appears that there will be, repeated crisis situations as described in AS

47.30.838(a)(1)

and the facility wishes to use psychotropic medication in future crisis situations; or

the facility wishes to use psychotropic medication in a noncrisis situation and has reason to believe the patient is incapable of giving informed consent.

An evaluation facility or designated treatment facility may seek court approval for administration of psychotropic medication to a patient by filing a petition with the court, requesting a hearing on the capacity of the person to give informed consent.

A patient who is the subject of a petition under (b) of this section is entitled to an attorney to represent the patient at the hearing. If the patient cannot afford an attorney, the court shall direct the Public Defender Agency to provide an attorney. The court may, upon request of the patient’s attorney, direct the office of public advocacy to provide a guardian ad litem for the patient.

Upon the filing of a petition under (b) of this section, the court shall direct the office of public advocacy to provide a visitor to assist the court in investigating the issue of whether the patient has the capacity to give or withhold informed consent to the administration of psychotropic medication. The visitor shall gather pertinent information and present it to the court in written or oral form at the hearing. The information must include documentation of the following:

the patient’s responses to a capacity assessment instrument administered at the request of the visitor;

any expressed wishes of the patient regarding medication, including wishes that may have been expressed in a power of attorney, a living will, an advance health care directive under AS 13.52, or oral statements of the patient, including conversations with relatives and friends that are significant persons in the patient’s life as those conversations are remembered by the relatives and friends; oral statements of the patient should be accompanied by a description of the circumstances under which the patient made the statements, when possible.

Within 72 hours after the filing of a petition under (b) of this section, the court shall hold a hearing to determine the patient’s capacity to give or withhold informed consent as described in AS

47.30.837

and the patient’s capacity to give or withhold informed consent at the time of previously expressed wishes regarding medication if previously expressed wishes are documented under (d)(2) of this section. The court shall consider all evidence presented at the hearing, including evidence presented by the guardian ad litem, the petitioner, the visitor, and the patient. The patient’s attorney may cross-examine any witness, including the guardian ad litem and the visitor.

If the court determines that the patient is competent to provide informed consent, the court shall order the facility to honor the patient’s decision about the use of psychotropic medication.

If the court determines that the patient is not competent to provide informed consent and, by clear and convincing evidence, was not competent to provide informed consent at the time of previously expressed wishes documented under (d)(2) of this section, the court shall approve the facility’s proposed use of psychotropic medication. The court’s approval under this subsection applies to the patient’s initial period of commitment if the decision is made during that time period. If the decision is made during a period for which the initial commitment has been extended, the court’s approval under this subsection applies to the period for which commitment is extended.

If an evaluation facility or designated treatment facility wishes to continue the use of psychotropic medication without the patient’s consent during a period of commitment that occurs after the period in which the court’s approval was obtained, the facility shall file a request to continue the medication when it files the petition to continue the patient’s commitment. The court that determines whether commitment shall continue shall also determine whether the patient continues to lack the capacity to give or withhold informed consent by following the procedures described in (b) — (e) of this section. The reports prepared for a previous hearing under (e) of this section are admissible in the hearing held for purposes of this subsection, except that they must be updated by the visitor and the guardian ad litem.

If a patient for whom a court has approved medication under this section regains competency at any time during the period of the patient’s commitment and gives informed consent to the continuation of medication, the evaluation facility or designated treatment facility shall document the patient’s consent in the patient’s file in writing.

History.

(§ 8 ch 109 SLA 1992; am § 13 ch 83 SLA 2004)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective January 1, 2005, inserted “an advance healthcare directive” in paragraph (d)(2).

Sec. 47.30.840.
Right to privacy and personal possessions; other rights.

A person undergoing evaluation or treatment under AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

may not be photographed without the person’s consent and that of the person’s guardian if a minor, except that the person may be photographed upon admission to a facility for identification and for administrative purposes of the facility; all photographs shall be confidential and may only be released by the facility to the patient or the patient’s designee unless a court orders otherwise;

at the time of admission to an evaluation or treatment facility, shall have reasonable precautions taken by the staff to inventory and safeguard the patient’s personal property; a copy of the inventory signed by the staff member making it shall be given to the patient and made available to the patient’s attorney and any other person authorized by the patient to inspect the document;

shall have access to an individual storage space for the patient’s private use while undergoing evaluation or treatment;

shall be permitted to wear personal clothing, to keep and use personal possessions including toilet articles if they are not considered unsafe for the patient or other patients who might have access to them, and to keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of the patient’s own money for the patient’s needs and comfort;

shall be allowed to have visitors at reasonable times;

shall have ready access to letter writing materials, including stamps, and have the right to send and receive unopened mail;

shall have reasonable access to a telephone, both to make and receive confidential calls;

has the right to be free of corporal punishment;

has the right to reasonable opportunity for indoor and outdoor exercise and recreation;

has the right, at any time, to have a telephone conversation with or be visited by an attorney;

may not be retaliated against or subjected to any adverse change of conditions or treatment solely because of assertion of rights under this section.

The patient’s rights under (a)(4), (5), (7) and (9) of this section may be suspended temporarily, following the initial evaluation period, if the professional person in charge of the patient determines that granting the patient those rights will pose a threat to the safety or well-being of the patient or others.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am §§ 23, 24 ch 142 SLA 1984; am § 9 ch 109 SLA 1992)

Sec. 47.30.845.
Confidential records.

Information and records obtained in the course of a screening investigation, evaluation, examination, or treatment are confidential and are not public records, except as the requirements of a hearing under AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

may necessitate a different procedure. Information and records may be copied and disclosed under regulations established by the department only to

a physician or a provider of health, mental health, or social and welfare services involved in caring for, treating, or rehabilitating the patient;

the patient or an individual to whom the patient has given written consent to have information disclosed;

a person authorized by a court order;

a person doing research or maintaining health statistics if the anonymity of the patient is assured and the facility recognizes the project as a bona fide research or statistical undertaking;

the Department of Corrections in a case in which a prisoner confined to the state prison is a patient in the state hospital on authorized transfer either by voluntary admission or by court order;

a governmental or law enforcement agency when necessary to secure the return of a patient who is on unauthorized absence from a facility where the patient was undergoing evaluation or treatment;

a law enforcement agency when there is substantiated concern over imminent danger to the community by a presumed mentally ill person;

the department in a case in which services provided under AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

are paid for, in whole or in part, by the department or in which a person has applied for or has received assistance from the department for those services;

the Department of Public Safety as provided in AS

47.30.907

; information provided under this paragraph may not include diagnostic or clinical information regarding a patient.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 25 ch 142 SLA 1984; am E.O. No. 55, § 44 (1984); am § 4 ch 74 SLA 2001; am § 2 ch 73 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For requirements for designated facilities, see 7 AAC 72, art. 3.

For grant programs, see 7 AAC 78.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective October 8, 2014, added (9), and made a related change.

Sec. 47.30.847.
Patients’ grievance procedures.

A patient has the right to bring grievances about the patient’s treatment, care, or rights to an impartial body within an evaluation facility or designated treatment facility.

An evaluation facility and a designated treatment facility shall have a formal grievance procedure for patient grievances brought under (a) of this section. The facility shall inform each patient of the existence and contents of the grievance procedure.

An evaluation facility and a designated treatment facility shall have a designated staff member who is trained in mental health consumer advocacy who will serve as an advocate, upon a patient’s request, to assist the patient in bringing grievances or pursuing other redress for complaints concerning care, treatment, and rights.

History.

(§ 10 ch 109 SLA 1992)

Sec. 47.30.850.
Sealing records.

Following the discharge of a person from a treatment facility or the issuance of a court order denying a petition for commitment, the person may at any time move to have all court records pertaining to the proceedings sealed on condition that the person file a full release of all claims of whatever nature arising out of the proceedings and the statements and actions of persons and facilities in connection with the proceedings. Upon the filing of the motion and full release, the court shall order the court records sealed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 11 ch 109 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 73 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective October 8, 2014, substituted “person” for “respondent” three times, substituted “sealed” for “expunged” following “pertaining to the proceedings”, deleted “either expunged or” following “order the court records”, and deleted “, whichever the court considers appropriate under the circumstances” at the end.

Sec. 47.30.851.
Relief from legal disability.

A person who is prohibited from possessing a firearm or ammunition under 18 U.S.C. 922(g)(4) as a result of an involuntary commitment or an adjudication of mental illness or mental incompetence that occurred in this state may, at any time, move to be relieved from the disability resulting from an involuntary commitment or an adjudication of mental illness or mental incompetence.

In ruling on a motion under (a) of this section, the court

shall consider

the circumstances of the involuntary commitment or adjudication of mental illness or mental incompetence;

the time that has elapsed since the involuntary commitment or adjudication of mental illness or mental incompetence;

the person’s reputation and mental health and criminal history records;

any conduct by the person that would constitute a crime against a person under AS 11.41 or a violation of AS

11.61.190

—

11.61.250

; and

any changes in the person’s condition or circumstances relevant to the relief sought; and

shall grant relief from the disability resulting from an involuntary commitment or adjudication of mental illness or mental incompetence if the court finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, that

the person is unlikely to act in a manner dangerous to self or to public safety; and

granting the relief is not contrary to the public interest.

The court shall order a hearing conducted under (b) of this section to be held open or closed to the public at the option of the person.

A decision to grant or deny relief under this section may be appealed as provided in AS

22.05.010

. In reviewing the decision of the superior court, the standard of review may be de novo.

History.

(§ 4 ch 73 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 73, SLA 2014, which enacted this section, took effect on October 8, 2014.

Sec. 47.30.855.
Posting of rights.

The rights set out in AS

47.30.817

—

47.30.855

shall be prominently posted in all treatment facilities in places accessible to all patients. A patient who does not understand English shall have the patient rights explained in a language the patient understands.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 79 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, substituted “AS

47.30.817

—

47.30.855

” for “AS

47.30.825

—

47.30.855

”.

Sec. 47.30.860.
Documents and notices in other languages.

When practicable, all documents and notices required by AS

47.30.660

—

47.30.915

to be served on a respondent, or on the respondent’s parents, guardian or adult designee, shall be explained in a language the person understands if the respondent is not competent in English.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981)

Sec. 47.30.865.
Discrimination prohibited.

The fact that a person is or has been evaluated or treated for mental illness may not be a basis for discrimination in

seeking employment;

resuming or continuing professional practice or previous occupation;

obtaining or retaining housing;

obtaining or retaining licenses or permits, including but not limited to a motor vehicle license, motor vehicle operator’s and chauffeur’s license, and a professional or occupational license.

Applications for positions, licenses, and housing may not contain requests for information concerning evaluation or treatment experiences.

A person may not aid, abet, incite, compel, or coerce the doing of an act forbidden under this section or attempt to do so.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981)